Utah statutes.
59-19-105.   Stamps to be affixed to marihuana and controlled substance --
Anonymity provided when purchasing stamps -- Collection and distribution of
tax -- Property in kind.
(1)  When a dealer purchases, acquires, transports, or imports into this state
marihuana or controlled substances, the dealer shall permanently affix the
official indicia on the marihuana or controlled substances evidencing the
payment of the tax required under this chapter.  A stamp or other official
indicia may not be used more than once.
(2)  Taxes imposed upon marihuana or controlled substances by this chapter are
due and payable immediately upon acquisition or possession in this state by a
dealer.
(3)  Payments required by this chapter shall be made to the commission on
forms provided by the commission.
(4) (a)  A dealer is not required to give the dealer's name, address, Social
Security number, or other identifying information on the form.
(b)  The commission or its employees may not reveal any facts contained in any
report, form, or return required by this chapter or any information obtained
from a dealer.
(c)  None of the information contained in a report, form, or return or
otherwise obtained from a dealer in connection with this section may be used
against the dealer in any criminal proceeding unless it is independently
obtained, except in connection with a proceeding involving taxes due under
this chapter from the dealer making the return.  This Subsection (4)(c)
supersedes any provision to the contrary.
(d)  A person who discloses information in violation of this Subsection (4) is
guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
(5)  This section does not prohibit the commission from publishing statistics
that do not disclose the identity of a dealer or the actual contents of any
reports, forms, or returns.
(6) (a)  The commission shall collect all taxes imposed under this chapter.
Amounts collected under this chapter, whether characterized as taxes,
interest, or penalties, shall be deposited in the Drug Stamp Tax Fund as a
dedicated credit and shall be applied and distributed under Section 63J-1-104
of the Budgetary Procedures Act as follows:
(i)  40% to the commission for administrative costs of recovery; and
(ii)  60% to the law enforcement agency conducting the controlled substance
investigation, to be used and applied by the agency in the continued
enforcement of controlled substance laws.
(b)  If there is more than one participating law enforcement agency, the 60%
under Subsection (6)(a)(ii) shall be divided equitably and distributed among
the agencies by the administrative law judge conducting the hearing to
determine taxpayer liability.  The distribution shall be based upon the extent
of agency participation as appears from evidence submitted by each agency
relative to actual time and expense incurred in the investigation.
(c)  If no law enforcement agency is involved in the collection of a specific
amount under this chapter, the entire amount collected shall be applied under
Subsection (6)(a)(i) to administrative costs of recovery.
(7) (a)  If property in kind obtained from the taxpayer is of use or benefit
to the commission in the enforcement of this chapter or is of use or benefit
to the participating law enforcement agency in the continued enforcement of
controlled substance laws, either the commission or the law enforcement agency
may apply to the administrative law judge for the award of the property.  If
the administrative law judge finds the property is of use or benefit either to
the commission or the law enforcement agency, the property shall be awarded
accordingly.
(b)  Before an award under this Subsection (7) is ordered, the property shall
be appraised by a court-appointed appraiser and the appraised value shall be
credited to the taxpayer.  If the taxpayer objects to the results of the
court-appointed appraisal, the taxpayer may obtain the taxpayer's own
appraisal at the taxpayer's own expense within 10 days of the court-appointed
appraisal.  The decision of the administrative law judge as to value is
controlling.
(c)  The value of any property in kind awarded to the commission or to the
participating law enforcement agency shall be counted as a portion of its
percentage share under Subsection (6).
(8)  Property of the taxpayer otherwise subject to forfeiture under Section
58-37-13 is not affected by this chapter if there is compliance with Section
58-37-13 regarding the forfeiture and the proceeds and property seized and
forfeited are accordingly divided and distributed.
